Washington statutes.
RCW 18.225.180

Supervision program—Database of qualified supervisors and facilities—Out-of-pocket expenses stipend. (Effective until October 1, 2025.)

(1)(a) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, by October 1, 2023, the department shall develop a program to facilitate placement of associates with clinical supervision services. The program must include a database of license holders with the required qualifications who are willing to serve as approved supervisors and agencies or facilities that offer supervision services through their facilities to associates seeking to satisfy supervised experience requirements under RCW 18.225.090.

(b) The department shall adopt, by rule, minimum qualifications for supervisors or facilities to be included in the database and minimum standards for adequate supervision of associates. The department may not include in the database any person who, or facility that, does not meet the minimum qualifications. The department shall periodically audit the list to remove persons who, or facilities that, no longer meet the minimum qualifications or fail to meet the minimum standards.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall establish a stipend program to defray the out-of-pocket expenses incurred by associates completing supervised experience requirements under RCW 18.225.090.

(a) Out-of-pocket expenses eligible for defrayment under this section include costs incurred in order to obtain supervised experience, such as fees or charges imposed by the individual or entity providing supervision, and any other expenses deemed appropriate by the department.

(b) Associates participating in the stipend program established in this section shall document their out-of-pocket expenses in a manner specified by the department.

(c) When adopting the stipend program, the department shall consider defraying out-of-pocket expenses associated with unpaid internships that are part of an applicant's educational program.

(d) The department shall establish the stipend program no later than July 1, 2024.

(e) The department may adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.

[ 2023 c 425 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 425 ss 1-7, 13-20, and 22-26: See note following RCW 18.83.170.

PDFRCW 18.225.180

Supervision program—Database of qualified supervisors and facilities—Incurred expenses stipend. (Effective October 1, 2025.)

(1)(a) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, by October 1, 2023, the department shall develop a program to facilitate placement of associates with clinical supervision services. The program must include a database of license holders with the required qualifications who are willing to serve as approved supervisors and agencies or facilities that offer supervision services through their facilities to associates seeking to satisfy supervised experience requirements under RCW 18.225.090.

(b) The department shall adopt, by rule, minimum qualifications for supervisors or facilities to be included in the database and minimum standards for adequate supervision of associates. The department may not include in the database any person who, or facility that, does not meet the minimum qualifications. The department shall periodically audit the list to remove persons who, or facilities that, no longer meet the minimum qualifications or fail to meet the minimum standards.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall establish a stipend program to offset the costs incurred when providing supervision for associates completing supervised experience requirements under RCW 18.225.090.

(a) To be eligible for the stipend program under this subsection (2), a supervisor must:

(i) Meet all requirements of a qualified supervisor in this chapter and chapter 246-809 WAC; and

(ii) Be actively providing supervision to at least one associate completing supervised experience requirements under RCW 18.225.090.

(b) Supervisors participating in the stipend program established in this section shall document their incurred expenses attributable to each supervised associate and time spent supervising each associate under their supervision in a manner specified by the department.

(c)(i) Supervisors receiving a stipend under this section are eligible for up to $2,000 per year per associate if the supervisor maintains the supervisory relationship for the entire year and subject to the availability of funds. If the supervisor does not provide supervision for an entire year, the department shall prorate the stipend amount accordingly.

(ii) If a participating supervisor's documented expenses attributable to a supervised associate exceed the stipend the supervisor receives under (c)(i) of this subsection for supervising that associate, the participating supervisor may charge the associate a fee to recoup the excess expenses attributable to that associate. In no case may a fee charged to an individual associate under this subsection (2)(c)(ii) exceed $1,600 per year. The supervisor shall report any fees charged to the associate to the department.

(d) The department shall establish the stipend program no later than July 1, 2025.

(3) The department may adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.

[ 2024 c 371 s 16; 2023 c 425 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2024 c 371 ss 1-12, 14, and 16: See note following RCW 18.19.020.

Rule making—2024 c 371 ss 1-16: See note following RCW 18.83.020.

Effective date—2023 c 425 ss 1-7, 13-20, and 22-26: See note following RCW 18.83.170.